California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(5) An officer or employee of the United States of America, or of this state or a political subdivision thereof, while the officer or employee is engaged in the performance of their official duties.

(6) A qualified certificate holder or a registrant when
 performing services for, or on behalf of, a licensee.

(7) A dealer, including its bona fide employees, regularly engaged in the sale of collateral designed primarily for agricultural use, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 51201 of the Government Code, for use in the care of lawns and gardens, or for use as special construction equipment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 565 of the Vehicle Code, or for use in the production, generation, storage, or transmission of mechanical or electric energy, that is subject to a security agreement of the manufacturer or an affiliate of that manufacturer, provided the following requirements are met:

(A) The dealer or the secured party maintains adequate records of all repossessions.

(B) The dealer or the secured party completes a collateral condition report.

(C) The dealer or the secured party records any odometer or hour meter readings.

(D) The dealer or the secured party creates records of all transactions pertaining to the sale of the collateral, including, but not limited to, bids solicited and received, cash received, remittances to the seller, and allocation of any moneys not so remitted to appropriate ledger accounts.

(E) The dealer removes and stores any personal effects that were taken with the collateral for a minimum of 60 days in a secure manner, completes an inventory of the personal effects, and notes the date that inventory is taken.

(F) If personal effects that were taken with the collateral are to be released to someone other than the debtor, the dealer shall request written authorization to
 do so from the debtor. The dealer may dispose of personal effects after storing them for at least 60 days pursuant to subparagraph (E).

(b) Entities described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), or a debtor, lienholder, lessor, lessee, registered owner, or an agent thereof shall not by any means, directly or indirectly, expressed or implied, instruct, coerce, or attempt to coerce another person to violate any law, regulation, or rule regarding the recovery of collateral, including, but not limited to, the provisions of this chapter or Section 9609 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [7501. - 7501.9.]

7501.

There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Bureau of Security and Investigative Services. The bureau is under the supervision and control of the director. The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.05.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.1.

The Governor shall appoint a chief of the bureau at a salary to be fixed in accordance with Section 12080.3 of the Government Code. The chief shall serve under the direction and supervision of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.2.

Every power and duty granted to or imposed upon the director under this chapter may be delegated to the chief, except that the director may not delegate authority to adopt or otherwise act upon any proposed decision of a hearing officer after a hearing under the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The chief may delegate any power or duty granted to or imposed upon him or her under this chapter to the deputy chief, to the assistant chief, or to any inspection, investigation, or auditing personnel of the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.3.

The director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, and Section 159.5, may appoint and fix the compensation of such clerical, inspection, investigation, and auditing personnel, as well as an assistant chief, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in Section 159.5, all personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and direction of the chief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.4.

The chief shall gather evidence of violations of this chapter and of any rule or regulation established pursuant to this chapter by persons engaged in the business of repossession who fail to obtain licenses and shall gather evidence of violations and furnish that evidence to the prosecuting officers of any county or city for the purpose of prosecuting all violations occurring within their jurisdiction.

The chief, with the approval of the director, may require the attendance of witnesses and examine under oath all persons whose testimony he or she requires, relative to the affairs of a licensee or to the subject matter of any examination, investigation, or hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.5.

It shall be the duty of the chief to initiate and conduct investigations into the business and affairs of licensees on the chief’s own motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.6.

The director may establish and enforce such rules and regulations as may be reasonable and necessary for the examination and licensing of applicants, for the conduct of licensees, and for the general enforcement of various provisions of this chapter in the protection of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.7.

If, upon investigation, the director determines that a licensee, a qualified certificate holder, or a registrant is in violation of Section 7508.1, 7508.2, 7508.3, 7508.4, 7508.5, or 7508.6, the director may issue a citation to the licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant. The citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including specific references to the provision of law determined to have been violated, and shall be delivered by certified mail to the licensee’s, qualified certificate holder’s, or registrant’s address of record. If the citation is issued to the qualified certificate holder or registrant, a copy of the citation shall also be sent by certified mail to the licensee’s address of record. If the director deems it appropriate, the citation may contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation and may contain assessment of an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

A citation or fine assessment shall inform the licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant that if he or she desires a hearing to contest the finding of a violation, the hearing shall be requested by written notice to the director within 30 days of the issuance of the citation or assessment, as appropriate. Any request for reconsideration received in writing by the director within the 30 days shall stay the 30 days allowed to request a hearing while the director reconsiders the fine assessment. Upon decision, the director shall notify the licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant in writing whether the fine assessment has been withdrawn or the fine assessment has been reaffirmed. If the fine assessment has been reaffirmed, the director shall again inform the licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant in writing that he or she has 30 days to request a hearing. If a hearing is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any fine shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged. Hearings shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

If the licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant neither requests a hearing nor pays the assessed fine within 30 days of the assessment, the license, qualification certificate, or registration of the person shall not be renewed pursuant to Section 7503.10 and no registration shall be issued pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 7506) until the assessed fine is paid.

Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 624, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.8.

(a) When considering the denial of a license, registration, or certificate under Section 7503.5, for which application has been made under this chapter, the director, in evaluating the rehabilitation of the applicant and the applicant’s present eligibility for a license, registration, or certificate, shall consider the following criteria:

(1) The nature and severity of the act or crime under consideration as grounds for denial.

(2) Evidence of any act committed subsequent to the act or crime under consideration as grounds for denial, which also could be considered as grounds for denial under Section 7503.5.

(3) The time that has elapsed since commission of the act or crime referred to in paragraph (1) or (2).

(4) The extent to which the applicant has complied with any terms of parole, probation, restitution, or any other sanctions lawfully imposed against the applicant.

(5) Evidence, if any, of rehabilitation submitted by the appplicant.

(b) When considering the suspension or revocation of a license, registration, or certificate issued under this chapter on the grounds of conviction of a crime, the director, in evaluating the rehabilitation of the person and the person’s present eligibility for a license, registration, or certificate, shall consider the following criteria:

(1) Nature and severity of the act or offense.

(2) Total criminal record.

(3) The time that has elapsed since commission of the act or offense.

(4) Whether the licensee has complied with any terms of parole, probation, restitution, or any other sanctions lawfully imposed against the licensee.

(5) If applicable, evidence of expungement proceedings pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(6) Evidence, if any, of rehabilitation submitted by the licensee.

(c) When considering a petition for reinstatement of a license, registration, or certificate, the director shall evaluate evidence of rehabilitation, considering those criteria of rehabilitation listed in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.9.

It is the intent of the Legislature, consistent with Section 128.5 of the Business and Professions Code, that the bureau shall not maintain a reserve balance of funds greater than the amount necessary to fund operating expenses of the bureau and that the bureau shall periodically review fees pursuant to this chapter to evaluate the appropriateness of each fee and the regulatory costs associated with each fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 20.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of Chapter [7502. - 7502.6.]

7502.

No person shall engage within this state in the activities of a repossession agency as defined in Section 7500.2 unless the person holds a valid repossession agency license or is exempt from licensure pursuant to Section 7500.2 or 7500.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.1.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or who conspires with another person to violate any provision of this chapter, or who knowingly engages a nonexempt unlicensed person to repossess collateral on that person’s behalf is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment. In addition, any tow vehicle subject to registration under the Vehicle Code that is used to violate any provision of this chapter is subject to removal and impound pursuant to Section 22850 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Within existing resources, the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Director of Motor Vehicles may
 each designate employees to investigate and report on violations of this chapter by any of the licensees of their respective departments. Those employees may actively cooperate with the bureau in the investigation of those activities.

(c) A proceeding to impose the penalties specified in subdivision (a) may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, by the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor, for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the
 city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 2.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.2.

(a) A financial institution or a buy-here-pay-here dealer, as defined by Section 241 of the Vehicle Code, that knowingly engages a nonexempt unlicensed person to repossess collateral on its behalf is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(b) Within existing resources, the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation may designate employees to investigate and report on violations of this section by any of the licensees of their department. Those employees are authorized to actively cooperate with the bureau in the investigation of those activities.

(c) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (a) may be brought in any court of
 competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, by the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor, for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 3.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.3.

Any person who knowingly falsifies the fingerprints or photographs required by any provision of this chapter is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.4.

In addition to the remedy provided for in Section 125.5, the superior court for the county in which any licensee licensed under this chapter has engaged or is about to engage in any act which constitutes a violation of this chapter may, upon a petition filed by the director and accompanied by an affidavit or affidavits in support thereof and a memorandum of points and authorities, issue a temporary restraining order or other appropriate order restraining the licensee from engaging in the business or profession for which the person is licensed or from any part thereof, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(a) If an affidavit in support of the petition show that the licensee has engaged or is about to engage in acts or ommissions constituting a violation of this chapter and if the court is satisfied that permitting the licensee to continue to engage in the business and profession for which the license was issued will endanger the public health, safety, or welfare, the court may issue an order temporarily restraining the licensee from engaging in the profession for which he or she is licensed.

(b) The order may not be issued without notice to the licensee unless it appears from facts shown by the affidavit that serious injury would result to the public before the matter can be heard on notice.

(c) Except as otherwise specifically provided by this section, proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that no undertaking shall be required.

(d) When a restraining order is issued pursuant to this section, or within a time to be allowed by the superior court, but in any case not more than 30 days after the restraining order is issued, an accusation shall be filed by the director pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code. The accusation shall be served upon the licensee as provided by Section 11505 of the Government Code. The licensee shall have all of the rights and privileges available as specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. However, if the licensee requests a hearing on the accusation, the director shall provide the licensee with a hearing within 30 days of the request and a decision within 15 days of the date of the conclusion of the hearing, or the court may nullify the restraining order previously issued. Any restraining order issued pursuant to this section shall be dissolved by operation of law at such time the director’s decision is subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.5.

The provisions of this chapter do not prevent the local authorities in any city, county, or city and county, by ordinance and within the exercise of the police power of the city, county, or city and county from requiring repossession agency licensees or registrants to register their names and a file copy of their state identification cards with the city, county, or city and county. No fee may be charged nor may any application be required by the city, county, or city and county for the registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.6.

(a) The superior court in and for the county wherein any person carries on, or attempts to carry on, business as a repossession agency without first having obtained a license pursuant to this chapter, or carries on that business after the revocation or expiration of any license or during the period of suspension of any license, may, on application of the director, or any person licensed under this act or association representing those licensees or any member of the general public, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct and may impose civil fines not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (a) and enjoin the unlicensed operation of
 a repossession agency business may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, by a city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor, for the jurisdiction in which the unlicensed activity has occurred. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(c) The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that there shall be no requirement to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of an adequate remedy at law or irreparable injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 3.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licenses [7503. - 7503.14.]

7503.

An application for a repossession agency license shall be made in writing to, and filed with, the bureau in the form that may be required by the director and shall be accompanied by the original license fee prescribed by this chapter. The director may require the submission of any other pertinent information, evidence, statements, or documents.

Every application for a repossession agency license shall be signed by the applicant and state, among other things that may be required, the name of the applicant and the name under which the applicant will do business, the location by number and street and city of the office of the business for which the license is sought, and the usual business hours the business will maintain. An applicant who declares as true any material matter pursuant to this section that he or she knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor. The residence address, residence telephone number, and driver’s license number of each licensee, principal owner of each licensee, and any applicant for a license, if requested, shall be confidential pursuant to the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and shall not be released to the public.

No license shall be issued in any fictitious name which may be confused with or which is similar to any federal, state, county, or municipal governmental function or agency, or in any name which may tend to describe any business function or enterprise not actually engaged in by the applicant, or in any name which is the same as or so similar to that of any existing licensee as would tend to deceive the public, or in any name which would otherwise tend to be deceptive or misleading.

The application form shall contain a statement informing the applicant that a false or dishonest answer to a question may be grounds for denial or subsequent suspension or revocation of a repossession agency license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.05.

(a) The bureau shall require each applicant as a repossession agency licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant, as defined in Sections 7500.1 and 7500.2, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the bureau shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for each individual applicant, if the applicant is an individual, each partner described in Section 7503.3, if the applicant is a partnership, each officer and owner described in Section 7503.4, if the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company, and each qualified certificate holder described in Section 7500.1.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 19.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.1.

(a) Each individual applicant for examination and each manager, partner of a partnership, and officer of a corporation shall submit with the application, one personal identification form provided by the chief upon which shall appear a photograph taken within one year immediately preceding the date of the filing of the application together with two legible sets of fingerprints, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, and a personal description of each person respectively.

(b) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants, excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 318, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.2.

If the applicant for license is an individual, the application shall state the full residence address of the applicant and that the applicant is to be personally and actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought, or if any other qualified certificate holder is to be actively in charge of such business, the application shall so state and set forth the name of the person. The application shall also state whether the applicant has ever used an alias. The application shall be subscribed and verified by the applicant and, if any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed and verified by that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.3.

If the applicants for license are copartners, the application shall state the true names and addresses of all partners and the name of the partner to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. If a qualified certificate holder other than a partner is to be actively in charge of the business then the application shall state the name and address of that person. The application shall be subscribed and verified by all of the partners and, if any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed and verified by that person. The application shall also state whether any of the partners has ever used an alias.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.4.

(a) If the applicant for a license is a corporation, the application shall state the true names and complete residence addresses of all officers. The application shall also state the name and address of the person to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed and verified by a duly authorized officer of the applicant and by the qualified certificate holder thereof. The application shall also state whether any of the officers has ever used an alias.

(b) If the applicant for a license is a limited liability company, the application shall state the true names and complete residence addresses of all owners and the name and address of the owner to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. If a qualified certificate holder, other than an owner, is to be actively in charge of the business, then the application shall state the name and address of that person. The application shall be subscribed and verified by each owner and, if any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed and verified by that person. The application shall also state whether any of the owners has ever used an alias.

(c) Nothing in this chapter permits a domestic or foreign limited liability company to be licensed as a repossession agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.5.

If the director determines that the applicant, if an individual, or if the applicant is a person other than an individual, that its manager and any of its officers and partners have committed any of the following acts, the director may deny the license:

(a) Committed any act, which, if committed by a licensee, would be a ground for the suspension or revocation of a license under this chapter.

(b) Committed any act constituting dishonesty or fraud.

(c) Been refused a license under this chapter or had a license revoked.

(d) Been an officer, partner, or manager of any person who has been refused a license under this chapter or whose license has been revoked.

(e) Committed, or aided and abetted the commission of, any act for which a license is required by this chapter while unlicensed.

(f) Knowingly made any false statement in his or her application.

(g) Committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

The denial shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if he or she desires a hearing to contest the denial, the hearing shall be requested of the director, in writing, within 30 days of the issuance of the denial.

When a hearing is held under this section, it shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 876, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.6.

No license may be issued to any applicant pending final disposition of any disciplinary action by the director previously filed against the person or applicant or against any partner or officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.7.

The form and content of the license shall be determined by the director in accordance with Section 164.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.8.

Each repossession agency license or duplicate license, together with current renewal license, if any, shall at all times be conspicuously displayed at the place of business on record with the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.9.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a repossession agency license issued under this chapter is not assignable.

(b) A repossession agency may apply to the chief for consent and, upon receipt of the consent and payment of the processing fee authorized by Section 7511, may assign a license to another business entity as long as the direct and indirect owners of the assignor own all of the assignee immediately after the assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.10.

(a) An original repossession agency license shall expire one year following the date of issuance, unless renewed as provided in this chapter.

(b) A renewal repossession agency license shall expire two years following the date of renewal, unless renewed as provided in this chapter.

(c) At least 60 days prior to the expiration of the license, the bureau shall mail to the licensee a renewal form prescribed by the director. To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall complete and mail the renewal form to the bureau, pay any and all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7501.7 and resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(d) Upon the issuance of the initial license or renewal license, the bureau shall issue to the licensee a suitable pocket identification card which includes a photograph of the licensee. The photograph shall be of a size prescribed by the bureau. The card shall contain the name of the licensee’s company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 456, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.11.

An expired license may be reinstated within one year of the date of expiration upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter, application by the licensee, and payment of any and all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7501.7 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section and payment of the reinstatement fee provided by this chapter. Reinstatement of an expired license shall not prohibit the bringing of disciplinary proceedings for any act committed in violation of this chapter during the period the license is expired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1299, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.12.

A suspended repossession agency license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but renewal of the license does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.13.

A revoked repossession agency license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.14.

(a) A repossession agency license which is not renewed within 10 years after its expiration shall not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter.

(b) The holder of the repossession agency license may obtain a new license
 only upon compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an original license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Examination [7504. - 7504.8.]

7504.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an applicant for a qualification certificate shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Be at least 18 years of age.

(2) Have been, for at least two years of lawful experience, during the five years preceding the date on which his or her application is filed, a registrant or have had two years of lawful experience in recovering collateral within this state. Lawful experience means experience in recovering collateral as a registrant pursuant to this chapter or as a salaried employee of a financial institution or vehicle dealer. Lawful experience
 does not include any employment performing work other than skip tracing or actual collateral recovery.

Two years’ experience shall consist of not less than 4,000 hours of actual compensated work performed by the applicant preceding the filing of an application.

An applicant shall certify that he or she has completed the claimed hours of qualifying experience and the exact details as to the character and nature thereof by written certifications from the employer, licensee, financial institution, or vehicle dealer, subject to independent verification by the director as he or she may determine. In the event of the inability of an applicant to supply the written certifications from the employer, licensee,
 financial institution, or vehicle dealer, in whole or in part, applicants may offer other written certifications from other persons substantiating their experience for consideration by the director. All certifications shall include a statement that representations made are true, correct, and contain no material omissions of fact to the best knowledge and belief of the applicant or the person submitting the certification. An applicant or person submitting the certification who declares as true any material matter pursuant to this paragraph that he or she knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) Complete and forward to the bureau a qualified certificate holder application which shall be on a form prescribed by the director and signed by the applicant. An applicant who declares as true any material matter pursuant to this paragraph that he or she knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor. The application shall
 be accompanied by two recent photographs of the applicant, of a type prescribed by the director, and two classifiable sets of his or her fingerprints. The residence address, residence telephone number, and driver’s license number of each qualified certificate holder or applicant for a qualification certificate, if requested, shall be confidential pursuant to the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and shall not be released to the public.

(4) Pass the required examination.

(5) Pay the required application and examination fees to the bureau.

(b) Upon the issuance of the initial qualification certificate or renewal qualification certificate, the bureau shall issue to the certificate holder a suitable pocket identification
 card which includes a photograph of the certificate holder. The photograph shall be of a size prescribed by the bureau. The card shall contain the name of the licensee with whom the certificate holder is employed.

(c) The application form shall contain a statement informing the applicant that a false or dishonest answer to a question may be grounds for denial or subsequent suspension or revocation of a qualification certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (AB 1859)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.1.

The director may refuse to issue a qualification certificate, or may suspend or revoke a previously issued qualification certificate, if the individual has committed any act which, if committed by a licensee, would be grounds for refusing to issue a license, or for the suspension or revocation of a license under this chapter.

The denial shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if he or she desires a hearing to contest the denial, the hearing shall be requested of the director within 30 days of the issuance of the denial.

When a hearing is held under this section, it shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.
